Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB532.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 4METROPOLITAN AND RURALPLANNING ORGANIZATIONSSec.401. Definitions.402. Membership requirements.§ 401. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Elected official." A mayor or a member of the governing 123456789101112131415161718 body of a city, borough, incorporated town or township."Metropolitan planning organization." As defined in 49 U.S.C. § 5303(b)(2) (relating to metropolitan transportation planning)."Rural planning organization." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "regional transportation planning organization" as defined in 49 U.S.C. § 5303(b)(5).§ 402. Membership requirements.(a) Composition.--Elected officials or individuals appointed by elected officials shall constitute the majority of the membership of a metropolitan planning organization and a rural planning organization. Elected officials or designees shall comprise a majority of the membership of a committee that serves as the policy board and technical board within a metropolitan planning organization and rural planning organization.(b) Bylaws.--Within one year of the effective date of this subsection, metropolitan planning organizations and rural planning organizations within this Commonwealth shall update bylaws to comply with the requirements of this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0532PN0525 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920